Washington statutes.
RCW 18.370.020

Minors prohibited—Proof of age.

(1) Persons under eighteen years of age are prohibited from using an ultraviolet tanning device without a written prescription for ultraviolet radiation treatment from a physician licensed under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW.

(2) Proof of age must be satisfied with a driver's license or other government-issued identification containing the date of birth and a photograph of the individual.

[ 2014 c 87 s 2.]